Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1132XS (5) 91 cm/jh S.F. 1 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 327D.16A Comparative fault ââ 1 limitation of application. 2 Notwithstanding sections 327D.188 and 668.3, in any actions 3 brought against any railway corporation to recover damages for 4 property damage, personal injury, or death in any crash or 5 collision in which the freight or work railroad train exceeded 6 seven thousand feet and the jury finds that the length of the 7 freight or work railroad train caused, in whole or in part, 8 the property damage, personal injury, or death in the crash or 9 collision, the recovery by the claimant or other party shall 10 not be diminished due to the comparative fault of the claimant 11 or other party. 12